Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2114
Plan; recommendations to governing body; statements required.

(1) The recommendation of a redevelopment plan by an authority to the governing body shall be accompanied by the recommendations, if any, of the planning commission or board concerning the redevelopment plan; a statement of the proposed method and estimated cost of the acquisition and preparation for redevelopment of the redevelopment project area and the estimated proceeds or revenue from its disposal to redevelopers; a statement of the proposed method of financing the redevelopment project; and a statement of a feasible method proposed for the relocation of families to be displaced from the redevelopment project area.

(2) This section shall not apply to a redevelopment plan that receives an expedited review under section 18-2155.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 6(7), p. 806;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1614;

Laws 1961, c. 61, § 9, p. 236;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2614;

Laws 2020, LB1021, § 8.